Maryland, session 2026, HB0097.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 7–310 of Article – General Provisions of the Annotated Code of Maryland
be renumbered to be Section(s) 7–311.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – General Provisions
7–310.
THE MEGALODON (OTODUS MEGALODON) IS THE STATE SHARK.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.